District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

5-129.31

Detective advisers.

Expired.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 1102, 51 DCR 9406
This section is referenced in § 5-704.
Delegation of Mayor’s Rulemaking Authority Pursuant to the Detective Adviser Act of 2004 to the Chief, Metropolitan Police Department, see Mayor’s Order 2005-99, June 14, 2005 ( 52 DCR 8165).
Pursuant to subsec. (d), this section expired 2 years after September 30, 2004.